Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 2
COMPENSATION OF COUNTY OFFICERS

Cross references:

For salaries and compensation of county officers, see §§ 8 and 15 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.; for the text of H.C.R. 85-1003, see L. 85, p. 1521.

Section

30-2-101. Classification of counties for salaries.

For the purpose of providing for and regulating the compensation of county and other officers, the counties of this state, other than home rule counties or home rule cities and counties, are classified as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 52:

p. 111, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-1.

L. 62:

p. 162, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

56-2-1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 2028, § 32, effective July 14.

30-2-102. Categorization of counties for fixing salaries of county officers - salary amounts - legislative declaration.

For the purpose of establishing the salaries of county officers whose terms of office begin prior to January 1, 2016:

Category I counties shall consist of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, Pueblo, and Weld;

Category II counties shall consist of the counties of Eagle, Fremont, Garfield, La Plata, Mesa, Pitkin, Routt, and Summit;

Category III counties shall consist of the counties of Alamosa, Archuleta, Chaffee, Clear Creek, Delta, Gilpin, Grand, Gunnison, Las Animas, Logan, Moffat, Montezuma, Montrose, Morgan, Otero, Park, Rio Blanco, San Miguel, and Teller;

Category IV counties shall consist of the counties of Custer, Elbert, Huerfano, Kit Carson, Lake, Ouray, Prowers, Rio Grande, Washington, and Yuma;

Category V counties shall consist of the counties of Baca, Bent, Cheyenne, Conejos, Costilla, Crowley, Dolores, Hinsdale, Lincoln, Mineral, Phillips, Saguache, and San Juan;

Category VI counties shall consist of the counties of Jackson, Kiowa, and Sedgwick.

(1.5) (a) For the purpose of establishing the salaries of county officers whose terms of office begin on or after January 1, 2016:

Category I-A counties consist of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, Pueblo, and Weld;

Category I-D counties consist of the county of Mesa.

Category II-A counties consist of the counties of Eagle, Garfield, La Plata, Routt, and Summit;

Category II-C counties consist of the counties of Fremont and Pitkin.

Category III-A counties consist of the counties of Chaffee, Clear Creek, Gunnison, Moffat, Montrose, Morgan, Park, Rio Blanco, San Miguel, and Teller;

Category III-B counties consist of the counties of Alamosa, Archuleta, Delta, Gilpin, Grand, and Logan;

Category III-C counties consist of the county of Otero;

Category III-D counties consist of the counties of Las Animas and Montezuma.

Category IV-A counties consist of the counties of Custer, Elbert, Ouray, and Prowers;

Category IV-B counties consist of the counties of Kit Carson, Lake, and Washington;

Category IV-C counties consist of the counties of Huerfano, Rio Grande, and Yuma;

Repealed.

Category V-A counties consist of the counties of Baca, Conejos, Costilla, Lincoln, Mineral, Phillips, and San Juan;

Category V-B counties consist of the counties of Crowley, Hinsdale, and Saguache;

Category V-C counties consist of the counties of Bent and Dolores;

Category V-D counties consist of the county of Cheyenne.

Category VI-C counties consist of the counties of Jackson and Sedgwick;

Category VI-D counties consist of the county of Kiowa.

On and after January 1, 2016, the general assembly may amend the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) by bill to move a county to any of the categories for which salaries are specified in subsection (2.3) of this section to another category. Such amendment shall be made only after giving due consideration to the variations among the counties including population, the number of persons residing in unincorporated areas, assessed valuation, motor vehicle registrations, building permits, military installations, and such other factors as may be relevant to reflect the variations in the workloads and responsibilities of county officers and the tax resources of the several counties.

The annual salaries of county officers whose term of office begins prior to January 1, 2002, shall be as follows:

(2.1) On and after January 1, 2002, but prior to January 1, 2007, the annual salaries of county officers whose term of office begins on or after January 1, 2002, but prior to January 1, 2007, shall be as follows:

(2.2) On and after January 1, 2007, but prior to January 1, 2016, the annual salary of a county officer whose term of office begins on or after January 1, 2007, but prior to January 1, 2016, is as follows:

(2.3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2.3), on and after January 1, 2016, the annual salary of a county officer whose term of office begins on or after such date is as follows:

Prior to January 1, 2018, and prior to January 1 each two years thereafter, the director of research of the legislative council appointed pursuant to section

2-3-304 (1)

shall adjust the amount of each annual salary in each category specified in subsection (2.3)(a) of this section in accordance with the percentage change over the period in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index. The director of research shall post the adjusted annual salary amounts on the website of the general assembly. The annual salary of a county officer whose term of office begins on or after the date the salaries have been adjusted pursuant to this subsection (2.3)(b) must be as adjusted by the director of research.

The annual salaries of full-time coroners for category II, III, and IV counties, as displayed in bold text and within parentheses in the table in subsection (2.3)(a) of this section, apply only to coroners whose terms begin on or after January 1, 2023, and must be adjusted prior to January 1, 2024, and prior to January 1 each two years thereafter in accordance with subsection (2.3)(b) of this section.

The salary of a full-time category II coroner is equal to the salary of a category II county commissioner, category II county treasurer, category II county assessor, and category II county clerk as indicated by the table in subsection (2.3)(a) of this section. The board of county commissioners may decline the full-time status of a category II coroner for cause, but only after the coroner is given notice and an opportunity to be heard by the board of county commissioners in a public hearing.

A coroner in a category III county may, in consultation with and with approval by the board of county commissioners, determine if a full-time position is appropriate. If a full-time position is agreed upon, the salary of a full-time category III coroner is equal to the salary of a category III county commissioner, category III county treasurer, category III county assessor, and category III county clerk as indicated by the table in subsection (2.3)(a) of this section.

A coroner in a category IV county may, in consultation with and with approval by the board of county commissioners, determine if a full-time position is appropriate. If a full-time position is agreed upon, the salary of a full-time category IV coroner shall be equal to the salary of a category IV county commissioner, category IV county treasurer, category IV county assessor, and category IV county clerk as indicated by the table in subsection (2.3)(a) of this section.

(2.5) Repealed.

(2.7) (Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 308, § 1, effective August 6, 1997.)

(2.8) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The rate of compensation of elected county officers shall be provided in accordance with the provisions set forth in section 15 of article XIV of the state constitution;

The salaries of county commissioners, sheriffs, treasurers, assessors, clerk and recorders, coroners, and surveyors have been fixed by law through the enactment of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 409, § 1, effective April 21, 1998.)

(a) to (d) Repealed.

(e) Except as provided in subsection (3)(f) of this section, no elected county officer shall have his or her compensation increased or decreased during the term of office to which he or she has been elected or appointed. All actual and necessary expenses of an elected officer incurred while engaged in business on behalf of the county may be allowed by the board of county commissioners and paid out of the county treasury.

(f) An elected county officer in a county classified for salary purposes under subsection (1.5)(a)(III), (1.5)(a)(IV), (1.5)(a)(V), or (1.5)(a)(VI) of this section may elect in his or her sole discretion to receive an amount of salary that is lower than the amount provided for in this section. The amount of the lower salary received by an officer shall be fifty percent of the amount of the salary otherwise provided for the officer as set forth in this section. Any such election shall be set forth in writing and recorded with the office of the county clerk and recorder during the month of November. Any additional money available to a county as a result of an elected county officer making an election pursuant to this subsection (3)(f) shall remain available for expenditure in the county general fund. An elected county officer who elects to receive a lower salary pursuant to this subsection (3)(f) may subsequently elect to receive a higher salary so long as the amount of the higher salary does not exceed the amount provided for in this section. In no event shall an elected county officer make more than one election per year pursuant to this subsection (3)(f).

The board of county commissioners may adjust the salaries established in this section pro rata for county officers working part-time.

The salaries established pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until such time that section 15 of article XIV of the constitution of the state of Colorado is amended to authorize or direct the board of county commissioners in each county to fix the compensation of county officers.

If any provision of this section is found to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining provisions of this section are valid, unless the court determines that the valid provisions, standing alone, are incomplete and are incapable of being executed.

County

Treasurers,

County

County

Assessors,

Commissioners

Sheriffs

and Clerks

(a) Category I
63,203
71,293
63,203
(b) Category II
51,827
57,768
51,827
(c) Category III
41,714
53,091
41,714
(d) Category IV
35,394
47,782
35,394
(e) Category V
32,613
36,405
32,613

County

Treasurers,

County

County

Assessors,
County

Commissioners

Sheriffs

and Clerks
Coroners

(a) Category I
63,203
95,000
75,500
75,500
(b) Category II
51,827
75,000
62,000
32,000
(c) Category III
41,714
65,000
50,000
25,000
(d) Category IV
35,394
57,000
42,500
17,000
(e) Category V
32,613
42,000
37,500
6,500

County

Treasurers,

County

County

Assessors,

County

County

Commissioners

Sheriffs

and Clerks

Coroners

Surveyors

(a) Category I
87,300
111,100
87,300
87,300
5,500
(b) Category II
72,500
87,700
72,500
44,200
4,400
(c) Category III
58,500
76,000
58,500
33,100
3,300
(d) Category IV
49,700
66,600
49,700
22,100
2,200
(e) Category V
43,800
49,100
43,800
9,900
1,100
(f) Category VI
39,700
46,500
39,700
9,000
1,000

County

Treasurers,

County

County

Assessors,

County

County

Commissioners

Sheriffs

and Clerks

Coroners

Surveyors

Category I-A
113,490
144,430
113,490
113,490
7,150
Category I-B
104,760
133,320
104,760
104,760
6,600
Category I-C
96,030
122,210
96,030
96,030
6,050
Category I-D
87,300
111,100
87,300
87,300
5,500
Category II-A
94,250
114,010
94,250
57,460
5,720
Category II-B
87,000
105,240
87,000
53,040
5,280
Category II-C
79,750
96,470
79,750
48,620
4,840
Category II-D
72,500
87,700
72,500
44,200
4,400
Category III-A
76,050
98,800
76,050
43,030
4,290
Category III-B
70,200
91,200
70,200
39,720
3,960
Category III-C
64,350
83,600
64,350
36,410
3,630
Category III-D
58,500
76,000
58,500
33,100
3,300
Category IV-A
64,610
86,580
64,610
28,730
2,860
Category IV-B
59,640
79,920
59,640
26,520
2,640
Category IV-C
54,670
73,260
54,670
24,310
2,420
Category IV-D
49,700
66,600
49,700
22,100
2,200
Category V-A
56,940
63,830
56,940
12,870
1,430
Category V-B
52,560
58,920
52,560
11,880
1,320
Category V-C
48,180
54,010
48,180
10,890
1,210
Category V-D
43,800
49,100
43,800
9,900
1,100
Category VI-A
51,610
60,450
51,610
11,700
1,300
Category VI-B
47,640
55,800
47,640
10,800
1,200
Category VI-C
43,670
51,150
43,670
9,900
1,100
Category VI-D
39,700
46,500
39,700
9,000
1,000

Source:

L. 52:

p. 111, § 3.

CSA:

C. 66, § 58(7f).

L. 53:

p. 297, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-4.

L. 57:

p. 372, § 1.

L. 58:

p. 233, § 1.

L. 61:

p. 379, §§ 1, 2.

L. 62:

p. 163, § 3.

L. 70:

R&RE, p. 192, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-2-102.

L. 73:

p. 624, § 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1432, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1423, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 86:

(1)(a) to (1)(c), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, (2.5) added, and (3)(a) to (3)(d) repealed, pp. 1032, 1033, §§ 1, 2, effective May 5.

L. 87:

(2.5)(b) repealed, p. 1582, § 40, effective July 10.

L. 88:

(3)(e) amended, p. 917, § 3, effective April 14.

L. 89:

(2) R&RE, (2.3) added, and (2.5)(a) amended, p. 1272, §§ 1, 2, effective May 17.

L. 90:

(1) and (2) R&RE and (2.3) and (2.5)(a) repealed, pp. 1442, 1443, §§ 1, 2, effective April 17.

L. 91:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 714, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 92:

(2.7) added, p. 965, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(1), (2), and (2.7) amended and (2.8) added, p. 308, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(1) and (2.8)(c) amended, p. 409, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2000:

(2) amended and (2.1) added, p. 295, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(d), (1)(e), (2), and (2.1) amended, p. 449, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) amended, p. 7, § 1, effective August 7; (2.1) amended, p. 365, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, p. 808, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2005:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, p. 374, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1)(e), IP(2.1), and (2.8)(b) amended and (1)(f) and (2.2) added, p. 448, §§ 1, 2, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 09-1203), ch. 102, p. 377, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(e) and (1)(f) amended, (HB 14-1223), ch. 87, p. 332, § 1, effective August 6; (1)(e) and (1)(f) amended, (HB 14-1307), ch. 163, p. 573, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, (HB 15-1256), ch. 91, p. 261, § 1, effective August 5; IP(1) and (2.2) amended, (1.5) added, and (2.3) RC&RE, (SB 15-288), ch. 270, p. 1060, § 3, effective January 1, 2016.

L. 2016:

(1.5)(a) amended, (HB 16-1367), ch. 301, p. 1217, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(a)(IV)(A) and (1.5)(a)(IV)(B) amended, (HB 17-1128), ch. 28, p. 83, § 1, effective March 8.

L. 2018:

(2.3)(b) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1715, § 67, effective May 29; (1.5)(a)(III)(B), (1.5)(a)(III)(D), (1.5)(a)(IV)(C), (1.5)(a)(V)(B), (1.5)(a)(V)(D), and (1.5)(a)(VI) amended and (1.5)(a)(IV)(D) repealed, (HB 18-1242), ch. 141, p. 917, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(1.5)(a)(III)(A), (1.5)(a)(III)(B), (1.5)(a)(IV)(B), and (1.5)(a)(IV)(C) amended, (HB 20-1281), ch. 136, p. 590, § 1, effective September 14; (3)(e) amended and (3)(f) added, (HB 20-1029), ch. 242, p. 1165, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(2.3)(a) amended and (2.3)(c), (2.3)(d), (2.3)(e), and (2.3)(f) added, (SB 22-065), ch. 45, p. 221, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsections (1)(e) and (1)(f) by HB 14-1223 and HB 14-1307 were harmonized.

30-2-103. County commissioners - expenses.

County commissioners shall be allowed their actual and necessary maintenance expenses, together with such mileage as shall be determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of the county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county, within the limits provided under section 30-11-107 (1)(t), for each mile actually traveled whether within or without the state when engaged in business on behalf of the county; but no mileage expense shall be allowed while said commissioners are traveling in an automobile furnished by the county.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 335, § 8.

CSA:

C. 66, § 58(8).

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-2-9.

L. 72:

p. 597, § 80.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 443, § 3, effective March 3.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 655, § 2, effective July 1.

30-2-104. Compensation of deputies and assistants.

The county clerk and recorders, county treasurers, county assessors, county coroners, and surveyors of the respective counties may appoint such deputies, assistants, and employees as shall be necessary at the compensation, payable at least once each month, as fixed by the officers with the approval of the boards of county commissioners of their respective counties. Except for those employees provided for pursuant to article 1 of title 26, C.R.S., boards of county commissioners may adopt a classification and compensation plan for all county employees paid in whole or in part by the county. The classification and compensation plan shall include workweek formulas of not less than forty hours designed to satisfy the varying requirements of each county service and county department as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1). Upon acceptance by an elected official, the plan shall become binding upon the employees of that office. Changes in benefits, pay grades, and job classifications of employees shall thereafter be made in accordance with the plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, workweek formulas shall take into account the various services provided by the county, the operation of the various county departments, and the demands which such services and operations have in requiring employees to be on the job in a manner which is not in conformity with the basic forty-hour workweek which generally characterizes office work.

Such workweek formulas may provide for work time in excess of forty hours during consecutive seven-day calendar periods. In such cases, computation of forty-hour pay periods may be based on an averaging formula covering more than such seven-day calendar period.

Authorized overtime work shall relate to such averaged workweeks where determined in the classification and compensation plan applicable to a described department or service.

All employees who work overtime pursuant to any classification and compensation plan shall receive overtime compensation, either in cash or in compensatory time.

In the event litigation is instituted relating to compensation or classification, the burden of proof shall be upon the plaintiff or the elected official instituting such action. Costs of any litigation instituted by an elected official shall be paid out of the county general fund.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 336, § 9.

CSA:

C. 66, § 58(9).

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-2-10.

L. 73:

p. 629, § 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1134, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 81:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1425, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 84:

(1)(a) amended, p. 582, § 3, effective March 19.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 806, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 449, § 3, effective August 7.

30-2-105. Superintendent of schools - mileage. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 45:

p. 336, § 10.

CSA:

C. 66, § 58(10).

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-2-11.

L. 72:

p. 597, § 81.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 443, § 4, effective March 3.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 656, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 582, § 1, effective March 19.

30-2-106. Undersheriffs and deputies - salaries - report of fees.

Undersheriffs and deputy sheriffs shall be appointed by the sheriffs of their respective counties, and their salaries shall be paid at least once each month. In all counties the salaries of the undersheriff and deputy sheriff shall be fixed by the sheriff, with the approval of the board of county commissioners.

The undersheriff and each deputy sheriff shall make to the sheriff a report in writing, under oath, of all fees collected of any description whatsoever and of all expenditures and necessary expenses relating to the discharge of the duties of his office.

In addition thereto such sheriffs, undersheriffs, and deputy sheriffs shall be allowed such mileage as shall be determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of each county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county, within the limits provided under section 30-11-107 (1)(t), for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in the performance of their duties.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 336, § 13.

CSA:

C. 66, § 58(13).

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-2-12.

L. 72:

p. 597, § 82.

L. 78:

(3) amended, p. 444, § 5, effective March 3.

L. 80:

(3) amended, p. 656, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 806, § 2, effective July 1.

30-2-107. Traveling expenses of sheriff.

Sheriffs also shall be allowed actual traveling expenses payable out of the general county fund, upon certified itemized accounts being presented for the same, in the service of all warrants, capiases, mittimuses, commitments, body attachments, and court orders requiring the same and in the performance of the official duties in the investigation and pursuit of law violators throughout the state of Colorado in such amount as shall be determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of each county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county, within the limits provided under section 30-11-107 (1)(t); but the actual expenses incurred in the service of executions, writs of attachment, replevins, restitutions, and other process shall be paid by the parties requiring such service. All such accounts shall be subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 311, § 11.

L. 1899:

p. 335, § 7.

L. 07:

p. 398, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2571.

L. 15:

p. 245, § 1.

L. 17:

p. 227, § 4.

L. 19:

p. 373, § 3.

C.L.

§ 7928.

CSA:

C. 66, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-2-16.

L. 72:

p. 598, § 83.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 444, § 6, effective March 3.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 656, § 5, effective July 1.

30-2-108. Coroner - compensation - mileage.

Repealed.

In counties of every class, the coroner shall be reimbursed for such mileage as shall be determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of the county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county, within the limits provided under section 30-11-107 (1)(t), for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going to and returning from the place of investigation or the place of inquest, which reimbursement shall be paid out of the county treasury.

In counties of every class, the board of county commissioners shall provide for reimbursement to coroners for expenses related to travel by the coroner for the purpose of testifying as a witness or acting in any other official capacity with respect to any legal proceeding involving a death investigated by that coroner. Such reimbursement may include a mileage allowance for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in an amount determined by the board within the limits provided under section 30-11-107 (1)(t) and actual and necessary lodging, subsistence, and incidental expenses as determined by the board. Such reimbursement shall be paid out of the county treasury.

In counties of every class, the board of county commissioners may provide for additional compensation to be paid to any coroner who performs a post-mortem examination of the body of a deceased person pursuant to section 30-10-606 (2), which compensation shall be paid out of the county treasury.

In addition to the fees provided in subsection (1) of this section, the coroner shall receive the same fees for summoning jurors and witnesses, and swearing jurors and witnesses, as are now allowed by law for like service. For all services performed in place of the sheriff, the coroner shall receive the same fees as are allowed to the sheriff for like service.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 214, § 9.

R.S. 08:

§ 2577.

L. 15:

p. 238, § 1.

C.L.

§ 7935.

CSA:

C. 66, § 85.

CRS 53:

§ 56-2-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-2-17.

L. 70:

p. 195, § 2.

L. 73:

p. 627, § 2.

L. 78:

(1) amended, p. 444, § 7, effective March 3.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 656, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1425, § 2, effective May 6.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1275, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 365, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) repealed, p. 450, § 5, effective August 7.